Washington statutes.
RCW 3.50.480

City or town trial court improvement account—Contributions to account by city or town—Use of funds.

Any city or town operating a municipal court under this chapter for which the state contributes to municipal court judges' salaries under RCW 2.56.030 shall create a city or town trial court improvement account. An amount equal to one hundred percent of the state's contribution for the payment of the city's or town's municipal court judges' salaries shall be deposited into the account. Money in the account shall be used to fund improvements to the municipal court's staffing, programs, facilities, or services, as appropriated by the city or town legislative authority.

[ 2005 c 457 s 3.]

NOTES:

Intent—2005 c 457: See note following RCW 43.08.250.